New York, session 2025-2026, A95.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1266 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 20 to read as follows: 3 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority and any 4 of its subsidiary corporations shall establish and implement a half fare 5 rate program for veterans, provided, however, the authority shall not 6 pay any costs or expenses related to the half fare rate program from its 7 operating or capital budgets and may only implement the half fare rate 8 program with funds appropriated to it by the state of New York for such 9 purpose. For purposes of this subdivision "veteran" shall mean a member 10 of the armed forces of the United States who served and was honorably 11 discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable from 12 such service, and presents an authorized veteran identification card, 13 and who is a resident of the state of New York at the time of applica- 14 tion for the half fare rate program. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00893-01-5